Washington statutes.
RCW 18.84.160

Application of chapter—Exemption for chiropractors.

This chapter does not apply to practitioners licensed under chapter 18.25 RCW or unlicensed persons supervised by persons licensed under chapter 18.25 RCW.

[ 1991 c 222 s 8.]